Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
342G

INTEGRATED
SOLID WASTE MANAGEMENT

Part I. General Provisions

Section

342G-1 Definitions

342G-2 Solid waste management priorities

342G-3 Goals

Part II. Administration

342G-11 Administration

342G-12 Office of solid waste management,
establishment

342G-12.5 Recycling coordinator

342G-13 Powers and duties of the department

342G-14 Powers and duties of the office of solid
waste

management

342G-15 Annual report

Part III. Integrated Solid Waste
Management Planning

342G-21 Establishment of county integrated solid
waste

management plans

342G-22 Development of county integrated solid
waste

management plans

342G-23 State review of county integrated solid
waste

management plans

342G-24 Submission schedule for revised
integrated solid

waste management plans

342G-25 Contents of county integrated solid
waste management

plans

342G-26 Contents of the program element

342G-27 Contents of the facility capacity and
siting element

342G-28 Facility permitting

342G-29 Revisions to the state integrated solid
waste

management plan

342G-30 Records

342G-31 Guidelines

Part IV. Governmental Coordination

342G-41 Goals for recycled product procurement

342G-42 Office responsibilities for recycled
products

procurement

342G-43 Reporting

342G-44 Double-sided copying

342G-45 Establishment of an office paper and
other materials

recovery program

342G-46 Coordination of bioconversion programs

342G-47 State agency responsibilities in the
promotion of

bioconversion

342G-48 Recycling market development

342G-49 Repealed

Part V. Solid Waste Management Surcharge

342G-61 Solid waste collection surcharge

342G-62 Solid waste disposal surcharge

342G-63 Establishment of the environmental
management

special fund

342G-64 Administration of the environmental
management

special fund

Part VI. Enforcement and Penalties

342G-71 Penalties

342G-72 Enforcement

Part VII. Glass Container Recovery

342G-81 Definitions

342G-82 Advance disposal fee

342G-83 Glass container importers; registration,

recordkeeping requirements

342G-84 Deposit into environmental management
special fund;

distribution to counties

342G-85 Container inventory report and payment

342G-86 County glass recovery programs;
requirements

342G-87 Contract for administrative services

342G-88, 89 Repealed

Part VIII. Deposit Beverage Container
Program

342G-101 Definitions

342G-101.5 Commercial passenger vessels; exemption

342G-102 Deposit beverage container fee

342G-102.5 Repealed

342G-103 Deposit beverage distributors;
registration,

recordkeeping requirements

342G-104 Deposit into deposit beverage container
deposit

special fund; use of funds

342G-105 Deposit beverage container inventory
report and

payment

342G-106 Contract for administrative services

342G-107 Management and financial audit

342G-108 Reserved

342G-109 Rules; commencement

342G-110 Payment and application of deposits

342G-111 Sales of beverages in deposit beverage
containers;

distributor report; fee and deposit
payment

342G-112 Deposit beverage container requirements

342G-113 Redemption of empty deposit beverage
containers

342G-114 Redemption centers

342G-114.5 Repealed

342G-115 Reverse vending machine requirements

342G-116 Refusal of refund value payment for a
deposit

beverage container

342G-117 Handling fees and refund values for
certified

redemption centers

342G-118 Reserved

342G-119 Redemption center reporting

342G-120 Recycling facility reporting

342G-121 Audit authority

342G-122 Advisory committee

342G-123 Repealed

Cross References

Construction projects; recycled glass requirements, see
§103D-407.

Environmental courts, jurisdiction over proceedings arising
under this chapter, see §604A-2.

Litter control, see chapter 339.

Plastic container coding, see §§342H-41, 42.

Special wastes recycling, see chapter 342I.

Law Journals and Reviews

Municipal Waste Combustion: A Wasted Investment? 12 UH L.
Rev. 215.

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next